apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON CNJ-withO-40
%<scpl1%>@U.CONJ-PX.4%0@:вО1линек@U.CONJ-PX.4%0@ Derya_KLoss ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-42
%<scpl1%>%<ocsg2%>@U.CONJ-PX.42@:вО1лидизь@U.CONJ-PX.42@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-43
%<scpl1%>%<ocsg3%>@U.CONJ-PX.43@:вО1линек@U.CONJ-PX.43@ Derya_KLoss ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-45
%<scpl1%>%<ocpl2%>@U.CONJ-PX.45@:вО1лидизь@U.CONJ-PX.45@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-46
%<scpl1%>%<ocpl3%>@U.CONJ-PX.46@:вО1линек@U.CONJ-PX.46@ Derya_KLoss ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-50
%<scpl2%>@U.CONJ-PX.5%0@:вО1лиде@U.CONJ-PX.5%0@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-51
%<scpl2%>%<ocsg1%>@U.CONJ-PX.51@:вО1лимизь@U.CONJ-PX.51@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-53
%<scpl2%>%<ocsg3%>@U.CONJ-PX.53@:вО1линк@U.CONJ-PX.53@ Derya_KLoss ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-54
%<scpl2%>%<ocpl1%>@U.CONJ-PX.54@:вО1лимизь@U.CONJ-PX.54@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-56
%<scpl2%>%<ocpl3%>@U.CONJ-PX.56@:вО1линк@U.CONJ-PX.56@ Derya_KLoss ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-61
%<scpl3%>%<ocsg1%>@U.CONJ-PX.61@:вО1лимизь@U.CONJ-PX.61@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-62
%<scpl3%>%<ocsg2%>@U.CONJ-PX.62@:вО1лидизь@U.CONJ-PX.62@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-63
%<scpl3%>%<ocsg3%>@U.CONJ-PX.63@:вО1лизь@U.CONJ-PX.63@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-64
%<scpl3%>%<ocpl1%>@U.CONJ-PX.64@:вО1лимизь@U.CONJ-PX.64@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-65
%<scpl3%>%<ocpl2%>@U.CONJ-PX.65@:вО1лидизь@U.CONJ-PX.65@ Derya ;

LEXICON CNJ-withO-66
%<scpl3%>%<ocpl3%>@U.CONJ-PX.66@:вО1лизь@U.CONJ-PX.66@ Derya ;



LEXICON ConjPers-withO-all
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ ConjPers-withO-all_Obj ;
 CNJ-withO-10 ;
 CNJ-withO-20 ;
 CNJ-30 ;
 CNJ-withO-40 ;
 CNJ-withO-50 ;
 CNJ-60 ;


LEXICON ConjPers-withO-all_Obj
 CNJ-withO-12 ;
 CNJ-withO-13 ;
 CNJ-withO-15 ;
 CNJ-withO-16 ;
 CNJ-withO-21 ;
 CNJ-withO-23 ;
 CNJ-withO-24 ;
 CNJ-withO-26 ;
 CNJ-withO-31 ;
 CNJ-withO-32 ;
 CNJ-withO-33 ;
 CNJ-withO-34 ;
 CNJ-withO-35 ;
 CNJ-withO-36 ;
 CNJ-withO-42 ;
 CNJ-withO-43 ;
 CNJ-withO-45 ;
 CNJ-withO-46 ;
 CNJ-withO-51 ;
 CNJ-withO-53 ;
 CNJ-withO-54 ;
 CNJ-withO-56 ;
 CNJ-withO-61 ;
 CNJ-withO-62 ;
 CNJ-withO-63 ;
 CNJ-withO-64 ;
 CNJ-withO-65 ;
 CNJ-withO-66 ;


!! end

LEXICON Derya
%<pcle%>%<cond%>:деря VerbEnd_K ;
 VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON ImpDerya
%<pcle%>%<cond%>:деря VerbEnd_K ;
 VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON Derya_KLoss
%<pcle%>%<cond%>:деря VerbEnd_K ;
 VerbEnd_lak-ImpK ;


!! !!OPTATIVE 


LEXICON VA_ИЛЯ
%<v%>%<neg%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ Optative-noArrow ;
 ILYA_Obj ;
%<v%>%<neg%>: OPT-10 ;
%<v%>%<neg%>: OPT-20 ;
%<v%>%<neg%>: OPT-30 ;
%<v%>%<neg%>: OPT-40 ;
%<v%>%<neg%>: OPT-50 ;
%<v%>%<neg%>: OPT-60 ;
%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.2%0@:00@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.2%0@ K ;
%<v%>%<neg%>: IMPRT-50 ;

LEXICON ILYA_Obj
 OPT-12 ;
 OPT-13 ;
 OPT-15 ;
 OPT-16 ;
 OPT-21 ;
 OPT-23 ;
 OPT-24 ;
%<opt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocpl1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocpl1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.24@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-26 ;
 OPT-31 ;
 OPT-32 ;
 OPT-33 ;
 OPT-34 ;
%<opt%>%<scsg3%>%<ocpl1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scsg3%>%<ocpl1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.34@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-35 ;
 OPT-36 ;
 OPT-42 ;
 OPT-43 ;
 OPT-45 ;
 OPT-46 ;
 OPT-51 ;
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocsg1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocsg1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-53 ;
 OPT-54 ;
%<opt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocpl1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocpl1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-56 ;
 OPT-61 ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocsg1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocsg1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.61@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-62 ;
 OPT-63 ;
 OPT-64 ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocpl1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocpl1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.64@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
 OPT-65 ;
 OPT-66 ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocsg3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@:%>Ы2зь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocsg3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@:%>%^О2зь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.63@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

%<opt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocsg1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@:%>Ы2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocsg1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@:%>Ы2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.54@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocpl3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@:%>Ы2зь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scpl3%>%<ocpl3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@:%>%^О2зь@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.66@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;





!! !!IMPERATIVE 


LEXICON IMPRT-20
%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>0@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.2%0@:%>К1Ь2@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.2%0@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-21
%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocsg1%>00@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.21@:%>%^О2мак@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.21@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-23
%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocsg3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.23@:%>Ы2к@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.23@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-24
%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocpl1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocpl1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.24@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-26
%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocpl3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@:%>Ы2ть@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<use_sub%>%<dial%>%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>%<ocpl3%>@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@:%>Ы2000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.26@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-50
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>00@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.5%0@:%>%^О2дО1@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.5%0@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-51
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocsg1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocsg1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.51@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-53
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocsg3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.53@:%>Ы2нк@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.53@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-54
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocpl1%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.54@:%>%^О2змизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.54@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocpl1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.54@:%>%^О2мизь@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.54@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON IMPRT-56
%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>%<ocpl3%>0@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.56@:%>Ы2нк@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-PX.56@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON Imperative-kadoms
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@  Imperative_Obj-kadoms ;
 IMPRT-20 ;
 IMPRT-50 ;

LEXICON Imperative_Obj-kadoms
 IMPRT-21 ;
%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>Ы2%> IMPRT-21 ;
 IMPRT-23 ;
 IMPRT-24 ;
 IMPRT-26 ;
 IMPRT-51 ;
 IMPRT-53 ;
 IMPRT-54 ;
 IMPRT-56 ;

LEXICON Imperative-kundams
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@  Imperative_Obj-kundams ;
 IMPRT-20 ;
 IMPRT-50 ;

LEXICON Imperative_Obj-kundams
 IMPRT-21 ;
 IMPRT-23 ;
 IMPRT-24 ;
 IMPRT-26 ;
 IMPRT-51 ;
 IMPRT-53 ;
 IMPRT-54 ;
 IMPRT-56 ;


!! !!OPTATIVE 


!! 2012-11-09

LEXICON OPT-10
%<opt%>%<scsg1%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.1%0@:%>%^О2зан@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.1%0@  VerbEnd_K ;

LEXICON OPT-12
%<opt%>%<scsg1%>%<ocsg2%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@:%>%^О2стан@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scsg1%>%<ocsg2%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@:%>%^О2здан@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scsg1%>%<ocsg2%>0000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@:%>%^О2затан@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;
%<opt%>%<scsg1%>%<ocsg2%>000@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@:%>%^О2зтан@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@@U.CONJ-PX.12@ VerbEnd_ImpK ;

LEXICON Verbs
иля:иля VA_ИЛЯ  "älä" ;
